California, session 20252026, SB696.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6356.8 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:6356.8. (a) On and after July 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, firefighting apparatus, equipment, or specialized vehicles purchased by a fire department, including an all-volunteer fire department, or a fire protection district. (b) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:(1) “All-volunteer fire department” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6018.10.(2) “Firefighting apparatus, equipment, or specialized vehicles” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) Electronic and communication equipment, including radios, cellular telephones, laptops, and computers.(B) Specialized vehicles, including command staff vehicles, vessels such as boats and swift water rafts, ladder trucks, fire engines, and trailers.(C) Personal protective equipment, including self-contained breathing apparatuses, safety boots, and turnouts.(D) Equipment for vehicles, including ladders, hoses, axes, defibrillators, medical supplies, rope rescue equipment, auto extrication equipment, chainsaws, ventilation fans, wildland firefighting tools, portable water tanks, portable pumps, and thermal imaging cameras.(E) Tools, parts, and supplies used for maintaining the items listed above.(3) (A) “Fire department” means any of the following:(i) A fire department of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision.(ii)The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. (iii)(ii) A county forestry or firefighting department or unit.(B) “Fire department” does not include any fire department of the University of California, the California State University, or any other educational institution. the following:(i) A fire department of the University of California, the California State University, or any other educational institution.(ii) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws. (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section shall not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051.2 or 6201.2, pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, or any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051 or 6201 that is deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 6051.15 or 6201.15. (d) An exemption shall not be allowed under this section unless the purchaser furnishes the retailer with an exemption certificate, completed in accordance with any instructions or regulations as the department may prescribe, and the retailer retains the exemption certificate in its records and furnishes it to the department upon request. (e) (1) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(A) The specific goal that the exemption will achieve is to reduce the financial burden placed on local fire departments, thereby allowing for more efficient use of resources by those departments.(B) Detailed performance indicators for the Legislature to use to measure whether the exemption meets the goal described in subparagraph (A) are the following: (i) The number of taxpayers exempting purchases from tax pursuant to this section.(ii) The total dollar value of sales exempted from tax pursuant to this section.(2) On or before April 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall analyze the performance indicators in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) and shall submit a report of its findings to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. (f) This section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.